bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Вдигане на тежести > Машини за вдигане на тежести и стойки: Силови квадрати; Смит машини; Силови скрипци; Силови клетки
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Súlyemelés > Súlyemelő gépek és állványok: Erőállványok; Smith-gépek; Súlyemelő gépek csigával; Súlyemelő állványok
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Άρση βαρών > Μηχανήματα & δοκοί άρσης βαρών: Δοκοί ισχύος; Μηχανές Smith; Μηχανήματα άρσης βαρών με τροχαλίες; Ράφια άρσης βαρών
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Haltérophilie > Machines d’haltérophilie et supports pour barres: Racks à squat; Smith Machines; Machines d’haltérophilie avec poulies; Supports d’haltérophilie
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Posilování s činkami > Vzpěrací trenažéry a posilovací stojany: Posilovací stojany/věže; Posilovací stojany Smith machine; Posilovací stroje kladkové; Posilovací klece
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ยกน้ำหนัก > เครื่องยกน้ำหนักและแร็ค: พาวเวอร์แร็ค; สมิธแมชชีน; เครื่องยกน้ำหนักพร้อมรอก; แร็คยกน้ำหนัก
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Levantamento de peso > Aparelhos e suportes para levantamento de peso: Power Racks; Barra guiada Smith; Aparelhos para levantamento de peso com polias; Racks de levantamento de peso
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Podnoszenie ciężarów > Atlasy treningowe i stelaże na ciężary: Stojaki na sztangi; Maszyny Smitha; Atlasy z krążkami; Stojaki do podnoszenia ciężarów
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Dizanje utega > Sprave i stalci za dizanje utega: Stalak za vježbe s utezima; Višenamjenska sprava za vježbe s utezima; Sprave za dizanje utega s koloturnicima; Stalci za dizanje utega
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Sunkioji atletika > Sunkiosios atletikos treniruokliai ir stelažai: Štangų stovai; Smito staklės; Sunkiosios atletikos treniruokliai su skriemuliais; Sunkiosios atletikos stelažai
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Levantamiento de pesas > Máquinas de levantamiento de pesas: Bastidores eléctricos; Máquinas Smith; Máquinas de levantamiento de pesas con poleas; Bastidores para levantamiento de pesas
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Sollevamento pesi > Macchine e rastrelliere per sollevamento pesi: Rack di potenza; Macchine Smith; Macchine per sollevamento pesi con pulegge; Rastrelliere per sollevamento pesi
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Weight Lifting > Weight Lifting Machines & Racks: Power Racks; Smith Machines; Weight Lifting Machines with Pulleys; Weight Lifting Racks
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Ridicare de greutăți > Aparate și stații de antrenament pentru ridicat greutăți: Power Rack; Aparate Smith; Aparate pentru ridicat greutăți cu scripeți; Stații de antrenament pentru ridicat greutăți
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 举重 > 推举机: 力量架; 史密斯架; 带滑轮的举重机; 举重架
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Тяжелая атлетика > Силовые тренажеры, рамы и стойки: Силовые рамы; Тренажеры Смита; Блочные силовые тренажеры; Стойки под штангу
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 舉重 > 重量訓練機: 蹲舉架; 史密斯訓練機; 滑輪重量訓練機; 舉重架
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 역기 운동 > 역기 운동 기구/거치대: 파워 랙; 스미스머신; 도르래식 역기 운동 기구; 역기 거치대
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Vægtløftning > Vægtløftningsmaskiner: Powerracks; Smith-maskiner; Vægtløftningsmaskiner med remskiver; Vægtløfteracks
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Vektløfting > Vektløftingsmaskiner og -stativer: Vektstativer; Smith-maskiner; Vektløftingsmaskiner med trinser; Vektløftingsstativer
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Vzpieranie > Vzpieračské stroje a stojany: Stojanové konštrukcie; Posilňovacie stojany; Vzpieračské stroje s kladkami; Vzpieračské stojany
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Styrketräning > Maskiner och ställningar för styrketräning: Skivstångsställningar; Smithmaskiner; Tyngdlyftningsmaskiner med remskivor; Tyngdlyftningsställ
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ウェイトリフティング・重量挙げ > ウェイトリフティングマシン: パワーラック; スミスマシン; プーリーシステム ウェイトリフティングマシン; ウェイトリフティングラック
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Halterofilismo > Racks e máquinas de halterofilismo: Racks para musculação; Máquinas Smith; Máquinas para halterofilismo com pulleys; Racks para halterofilismo
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Gewichtheben > Krafttrainingsgeräte: Power-Racks; Smith Machines; Krafttrainingsgeräte mit Seilzügen; Gewichthebe-Racks
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Gewichtheffen > Krachtapparatuur en -rekken: Powerrekken; Smith-machines; Krachtapparatuur met riemschijven; Krachtrekken
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Painonnosto > Painonnostolaitteet ja -telineet: Kyykkytelineet; Kyykkyhäkit; Painonnostolaitteet taljoilla; Painonnostotelineet
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Ağırlık Kaldırma > Ağırlık Kaldırma Makineleri: Elektrikli Ağırlık Kaldırma Makineleri; Smith Makineleri; Makaralı Ağırlık Kaldırma Makineleri; Ağırlık Kaldırma Rafları
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Cử tạ > Giàn tập tạ: Ghế tập tạ; Máy Smith; Giàn tập tạ có ròng rọc; Giá tập cử tạ
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Dvigovanje uteži > Stroji in stojala za dvigovanje uteži: Naprave za vadbo moči; Naprave Smith; Naprave za dvigovanje uteži na škripcih; Stojala za dvigovanje uteži